District of Columbia statutes.
38-274.01a

Transfer of authority, assets, and funds.

(a)

The authority to establish the HEI program and the HEI scholarship program is transferred from the OSSE to the University of the District of Columbia.

(b)

By March 1, 2010, any real and personal property, positions, assets, and records relating to the HEI program or the HEI scholarship program, or to the planned establishment of the programs, shall become the property of the University of the District of Columbia, and any unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds available or to be made available to the OSSE for the HEI program or the HEI scholarship program, or the planned establishment of the programs, shall be transferred to the HEIG fund.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 401a
as added Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-285, § 2(g), 57 DCR 11005
Section 2(h) of D.C. Law 18-142 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 401a. Transfer of authority, assets, and funds.
“(a) The authority to establish the HEI program and the HEI scholarship program is transferred from the OSSE to the University of the District of Columbia.
“(b) Within 30 days of the effective date of the Pre-k Acceleration and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2010, passed on emergency basis on January 5, 2010 (Enrolled version of Bill 18-603), any real and personal property, positions, assets, and records relating to the HEI program or the HEI scholarship program, or to the planned establishment of the programs, shall become the property of the University of the District of Columbia, and any unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds available or to be made available to the OSSE for the HEI program or the HEI scholarship program, or the planned establishment of the programs, shall be transferred to the HEIG fund.”.
Section 5(a) of D.C. Law 18-142 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Pre-K Acceleration and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-304, January 28, 2010, 57 DCR 1475).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(h) of Pre-K Acceleration and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-304, January 28, 2010, 57 DCR 1475).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(g) of Pre-k Acceleration and Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-602, December 1, 2010, 57 DCR 11039).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Pre-k Acceleration and Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-602, December 1, 2010, 57 DCR 11039).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(g) of Pre-k Acceleration and Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 19-4, February 11, 2011, 58 DCR 1399).